North Dakota, session 69, SB2071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 43-47-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-47-03. Duties and responsibilities of board.
In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this chapter, the board shall:
1. Publish an annual list of the names and addresses of all persons licensed under this chapter.
2. Approve and administer an examination for counselors.
3. Set, by rule, and collect a fee for the:
a. The filing of each application for a license under this chapter and set, by rule, and collect
a fee for the;
b. The renewal of a license under this chapter;
c. The provision of a duplicate license under this chapter; and
d. Technology services.
4. Deposit and disburse all fees and moneys collected by the board in accordance with section
54-44-12.
5. Establish continuing education requirements for license renewal.
6. Issue provisional or probationary licenses.
7. Establish a code of ethics for the practice of counseling.
8. Adopt rules as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

S. B. NO. 2071 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2071.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 2 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State